Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158.04
Mobile nail technology salon; operating requirements.

In order to maintain its license in good standing, each mobile nail technology salon shall operate in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) The salon shall at all times comply with all applicable provisions of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(2) The salon owner or his or her agent shall notify the department of any change of ownership, name, or office address and if a salon is permanently closed;

(3) No salon shall permit any unlicensed person to perform any of the practices of nail technology within its confines or employment;

(4) The salon shall display a name upon, over, or near the entrance door distinguishing it as a salon;

(5) The salon shall permit any duly authorized agent of the department to conduct an operation inspection or investigation at any time during the normal operating hours of the salon, without prior notice, and the owner and manager shall assist the inspector by providing access to all areas of the salon, all personnel, and all records requested by the inspector;

(6) The salon shall display in a conspicuous place the following records:

(a) The current license or certificate of consideration to operate a salon;

(b) The current licenses of all persons licensed under the act who are employed by or working in the salon; and

(c) The rating sheet from the most recent operation inspection;

(7) At no time shall a salon employ more employees than permitted by the square footage requirements of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act;

(8) No nail technology services may be performed in a salon while the salon is moving. The salon must be safely and legally parked in a legal parking space at all times while clients are present inside the salon. A salon shall not park or conduct business within three hundred feet of another licensed nail technology establishment. The department is not responsible for monitoring for enforcement of this subdivision but may discipline a license for a reported and verified violation;

(9) The owner of the salon shall maintain a permanent business address at which correspondence from the department may be received and records of appointments, license numbers, and vehicle identification numbers shall be kept for each salon being operated by the owner. The owner shall make such records available for verification and inspection by the department; and

(10) The salon shall not knowingly permit its employees or clients to use, consume, serve, or in any manner possess or distribute intoxicating beverages or controlled substances upon its premises.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 61.